Utah statutes.
79-4-502.   Violations of rules.

Unless otherwise provided in this title, a violation of any rule of the Board of Parks and Recreation is an infraction.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 344, 2009 General Session 

Repealed and Re-enacted by Chapter 347, 2009 General Session

